District of Columbia statutes.
50-801

Repealed

Environmental identification tag.

Repealed.

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-182, § 2, 47 DCR 7057
Sept. 23, 2009, D.C. Law 18-55, § 9(b)(2), 56 DCR 5703
Delegation of Mayor’s Authority to the Director of the Department of Motor Vehicles to Issue Environmental Identification Tags, see Mayor’s Order 2004-126, August 2, 2004 ( 51 DCR 8007).